Massachusetts, session 194th, H2770.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general or special law, rule or regulation to the contrary, the
Massachusetts Teachers' Retirement System shall credit Diane Galanti, a member of the
Massachusetts Teachers' Retirement System, with creditable service for the period of December
12, 1988 to June 30, 1999, inclusive, for the purpose of determining her superannuation
retirement allowance pursuant to paragraph (a) of subdivision (2) of Section 5 of Chapter 32 of
the General Laws as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition. Before the date that any retirement
allowance becomes effective in the case of Diane Galanti, she shall pay into the annuity savings
fund of the retirement system in one (1) sum or installments, upon such terms and conditions as
the board may prescribe, an amount equal to that which would have been withheld as regular
deductions from her regular compensation for such previous service, plus buyback interest.
of 1